Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-24,110
Commission; power to regulate cannabis for medical purposes.

The power to regulate all phases of the control of the possession, manufacture, distribution, delivery, and dispensing of cannabis for medical purposes by registered cannabis establishments in the state pursuant to the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act is vested exclusively in the commission.

Initiative Law 2024, No. 438, § 5.